Ohio, session 136, HB387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 4303.182 be amended and section 6
4301.392 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 7
Sec. 4301.392. (A) In lieu of local option elections held 8
pursuant to sections 4301.32 to 4301.39 of the Revised Code, the 9
legislative authority of a municipal corporation or the board of 10
township trustees of a township may adopt an ordinance or 11
resolution, as applicable, allowing the sale of intoxicating 12
liquor on Sunday in the applicable municipal corporation or 13
township under a D-6 permit issued under section 4303.182 of the 14
Revised Code. 15
(B) If the legislative authority of a municipal 16
corporation or the board of township trustees of a township 17
adopts an ordinance or resolution under division (A) of this 18

H. B. No. 387 Page 2
As Introduced
section, the legislative authority or the board, as applicable, 19
shall send a copy of the ordinance or resolution to the division 20
of liquor control. 21
(C) Notwithstanding any provision of division (A) of this 22
section to the contrary, the privilege of local option election 23
provided for under section 4301.32 of the Revised Code remains 24
valid, and an ordinance or resolution adopted under division (A) 25
of this section may be superseded by a local option election 26
held pursuant to section 4301.351 or 4301.354 of the Revised 27
Code. 28
Sec. 4303.182. (A) Except as otherwise provided in 29
divisions (B) to (K) of this section, permit D-6 shall be issued 30
to the holder of an A-1-A, A-2, A-2f, A-3a, A-5, C-2, D-2, D-3, 31
D-3a, D-4, D-4a, D-5, D-5a, D-5b, D-5c, D-5d, D-5e, D-5f, D-5g, 32
D-5h, D-5i, D-5j, D-5k, D-5l, D-5m, D-5n, D-5o, or D-7 permit to 33
allow sale under that permit on Sunday. However, such a sale 34
only may be allowed if the sale has been approved under as 35
follows: 36
(1) Under a question specified in division (B) of section 37
4301.351 or 4301.354 of the Revised Code, in division (B)(2) of 38
section 4301.355 of the Revised Code, or in section 4301.356 of 39
the Revised Code and has been authorized under section 4301.361, 40
4301.364, 4301.365, or 4301.366 of the Revised Code, under the 41
restrictions of that authorization; 42
(2) By an ordinance or resolution adopted under section 43
4301.392 of the Revised Code. 44
(B) Permit D-6 shall be issued to the holder of any 45
permit, including a D-4a and D-5d permit, authorizing the sale 46
of intoxicating liquor issued for a premises located at any 47

H. B. No. 387 Page 3
As Introduced
publicly owned airport, as defined in section 4563.01 of the 48
Revised Code, at which commercial airline companies operate 49
regularly scheduled flights on which space is available to the 50
public, to allow sale under such permit on Sunday, whether or 51
not that sale has been authorized under section 4301.361, 52
4301.364, 4301.365, or 4301.366, or 4301.392 of the Revised 53
Code. 54
(C) Permit D-6 shall be issued to the holder of a D-5a 55
permit, and to the holder of a D-3 or D-3a permit who is the 56
owner or operator of a hotel or motel that is required to be 57
licensed under section 3731.03 of the Revised Code, that 58
contains at least fifty rooms for registered transient guests, 59
and that has on its premises a retail food establishment or a 60
food service operation licensed pursuant to Chapter 3717. of the 61
Revised Code that operates as a restaurant for purposes of this 62
chapter and is affiliated with the hotel or motel and within or 63
contiguous to the hotel or motel and serving food within the 64
hotel or motel, to allow sale under such permit on Sunday, 65
whether or not that sale has been authorized under section 66
4301.361, 4301.364, 4301.365, or 4301.366, or 4301.392 of the 67
Revised Code. 68
(D) The holder of a D-6 permit that is issued to a sports 69
facility may make sales under the permit on any Sunday on which 70
a professional baseball, basketball, football, hockey, or soccer 71
game is being played at the sports facility. As used in this 72
division, "sports facility" means a stadium or arena that has a 73
seating capacity of at least four thousand and that is owned or 74
leased by a professional baseball, basketball, football, hockey, 75
or soccer franchise or any combination of those franchises. 76
(E) Permit D-6 shall be issued to the holder of any permit 77

H. B. No. 387 Page 4
As Introduced
that authorizes the sale of beer or intoxicating liquor and that 78
is issued to a premises located in or at the Ohio history 79
connection area or the state fairgrounds, as defined in division 80
(B) of section 4301.40 of the Revised Code, to allow sale under 81
that permit on Sunday, whether or not that sale has been 82
authorized under section 4301.361, 4301.364, 4301.365, or 83
4301.366, or 4301.392 of the Revised Code. 84
(F) Permit D-6 shall be issued to the holder of any permit 85
that authorizes the sale of intoxicating liquor and that is 86
issued to an outdoor performing arts center to allow sale under 87
that permit on Sunday, whether or not that sale has been 88
authorized under section 4301.361 or 4301.392 of the Revised 89
Code. A D-6 permit issued under this division is subject to the 90
results of an election, held after the D-6 permit is issued, on 91
question (B)(4) as set forth in section 4301.351 of the Revised 92
Code. Following the end of the period during which an election 93
may be held on question (B)(4) as set forth in that section, 94
sales of intoxicating liquor may continue at an outdoor 95
performing arts center under a D-6 permit issued under this 96
division, unless an election on that question is held during the 97
permitted period and a majority of the voters voting in the 98
precinct on that question vote "no." 99
As used in this division, "outdoor performing arts center" 100
means an outdoor performing arts center that is located on not 101
less than eight hundred acres of land and that is open for 102
performances from the first day of April to the last day of 103
October of each year. 104
(G) Permit D-6 shall be issued to the holder of any permit 105
that authorizes the sale of beer or intoxicating liquor and that 106
is issued to a golf course owned by the state, a conservancy 107

H. B. No. 387 Page 5
As Introduced
district, a park district created under Chapter 1545. of the 108
Revised Code, or another political subdivision to allow sale 109
under that permit on Sunday, whether or not that sale has been 110
authorized under section 4301.361, 4301.364, 4301.365, or 111
4301.366, or 4301.392 of the Revised Code. 112
(H) Permit D-6 shall be issued to the holder of a D-5g 113
permit to allow sale under that permit on Sunday, whether or not 114
that sale has been authorized under section 4301.361, 4301.364, 115
4301.365, or 4301.366, or 4301.392 of the Revised Code. 116
(I) Permit D-6 shall be issued to the holder of any D 117
permit for a premises that is licensed under Chapter 3717. of 118
the Revised Code and that is located at a ski area to allow sale 119
under the D-6 permit on Sunday, whether or not that sale has 120
been authorized under section 4301.361, 4301.364, 4301.365, or 121
4301.366, or 4301.392 of the Revised Code. 122
As used in this division, "ski area" means a ski area as 123
defined in section 4169.01 of the Revised Code, provided that 124
the passenger tramway operator at that area is registered under 125
section 4169.03 of the Revised Code. 126
(J) Permit D-6 shall be issued to the holder of any permit 127
that is described in division (A) of this section for a permit 128
premises that is located in a community entertainment district, 129
as defined in section 4301.80 of the Revised Code, that was 130
approved by the legislative authority of a municipal corporation 131
under that section between October 1 and October 15, 2005, to 132
allow sale under the permit on Sunday, whether or not that sale 133
has been authorized under section 4301.361, 4301.364, 4301.365, 134
or 4301.366 of the Revised Code. 135
(K) A D-6 permit shall be issued to the holder of any D 136

H. B. No. 387 Page 6
As Introduced
permit for a premises that is licensed under Chapter 3717. of 137
the Revised Code and that is located in a state park to allow 138
sales under the D-6 permit on Sunday, whether or not those sales 139
have been authorized under section 4301.361, 4301.364, 4301.365, 140
or 4301.366, or 4301.392 of the Revised Code. 141
As used in this division, "state park" means a state park 142
that is established or dedicated under Chapter 1546. of the 143
Revised Code and that has a working farm on its property. 144
(L) If the restriction to licensed premises where the sale 145
of food and other goods and services exceeds fifty per cent of 146
the total gross receipts of the permit holder at the premises is 147
applicable, the division of liquor control may accept an 148
affidavit from the permit holder to show the proportion of the 149
permit holder's gross receipts derived from the sale of food and 150
other goods and services. If the liquor control commission 151
determines that affidavit to have been false, it shall revoke 152
the permits of the permit holder at the premises concerned. 153
(M) The fee for the D-6 permit is five hundred dollars 154
when it is issued to the holder of an A-1-A, A-2, A-2f, A-3a, A- 155
5, D-2, D-3, D-3a, D-4, D-4a, D-5, D-5a, D-5b, D-5c, D-5d, D-5e, 156
D-5f, D-5g, D-5h, D-5i, D-5j, D-5k, D-5l, D-5m, D-5n, D-5o, or 157
D-7 permit. The fee for the D-6 permit is four hundred dollars 158
when it is issued to the holder of a C-2 permit. 159
(N) Sunday sales of beer, wine, mixed beverages, or 160
spirituous liquor authorized under a valid D-6 permit issued 161
prior to, on, or after the effective date of this amendment 162
March 23, 2022, may occur during the same hours that a permit 163
holder may sell those products on Monday through Saturday. 164
Section 2. That existing section 4303.182 of the Revised 165

H. B. No. 387 Page 7
As Introduced
Code is hereby repealed. 166